Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.51, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin School on landfill site; prohibition; notice. new text end new text begin (a) No school may be constructed on land that is located within one-quarter mile of a dump site or closed landfill. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) "closed landfill" means a closed landfill site listed on the Pollution Control Agency website as a potentially contaminated site; new text end new text begin (2) "dump site" means: new text end new text begin (i) an unpermitted mixed municipal solid waste disposal site identified in the February 2001 Dump Assessment Study report to the legislature; new text end new text begin (ii) an unpermitted disposal site listed on the Pollution Control Agency website as a potentially contaminated site; or new text end new text begin (iii) a site known by a county solid waste officer to have been an unpermitted mixed municipal solid waste disposal site; and new text end new text begin (3) "school" means buildings, playgrounds, and athletic fields used by students at: new text end new text begin (i) a public school as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9, 11, 13, and 17; or new text end new text begin (ii) a charter school established and operated under chapter 124E. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end